Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 4
DISSOLUTION UPON EXPIRATION
OF PERIOD OF DURATION

7-134-401. Dissolution upon expiration of period of duration.

A nonprofit corporation shall be dissolved upon and by reason of the expiration of its period of duration, if any, stated in its articles of incorporation.

A provision in the articles of incorporation to the effect that the nonprofit corporation or its existence shall be terminated at a stated date or after a stated period of time or upon a contingency, or any similar provision, shall be deemed to be a provision for a period of duration within the meaning of this section. The occurrence of such date, the expiration of the stated period of time, the occurrence of such contingency, or the satisfaction of such provision shall be deemed to be the expiration of the nonprofit corporation's period of duration for purposes of this section.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 731, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2350, § 331, effective July 1, 2004.